Maine, session 132, LD2122.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3104, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 1979, c. 386, is amended by
enacting at the end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
The department shall establish a grant program to provide grants to community-based
organizations that have entered into contracts with the department to provide SNAP
outreach activities. The department may award a community-based organization a grant
under the grant program to provide matching funds for federal funding for approved SNAP
outreach activities and to hire a SNAP outreach community coordinator to improve
communications with SNAP recipients.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3104, sub-§18 is enacted to read:
18. Error rate reduction system. The department shall operate an electronic system
to detect and correct erroneous eligibility determinations for food allotments using
advanced mathematical methods, with a goal of reducing the error rate calculated by the
United States Department of Agriculture to a level that minimizes the State's share of the
costs of SNAP benefits. The electronic system must be capable of identifying root causes
of erroneous eligibility determinations and operate independently of another system or
systems used by the department to process and record eligibility determinations. The
electronic system must operate in conformity with regulations and error rate standards
promulgated by the United States Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3104, sub-§19 is enacted to read:
19. Contingency fund. The department shall establish and maintain a contingency
fund, referred to in this subsection as "the fund," as a nonlapsing fund to provide SNAP
benefits to recipients of SNAP benefits in the event the Federal Government fails to provide
funding for SNAP benefits to the State. The department, in its sole discretion, shall use
money from the fund for the purposes of this subsection in accordance with rules adopted
by the department. All money appropriated by the State for the purposes of the fund must
be deposited into the fund. The balance in the fund may not exceed $87,000,000. Rules
Page 1 - 132LR2759(01)

413 adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
424 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for the cost of contracting for a position to support and
manage the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program outreach activities, including the
SNAP Outreach Grant Program, and assist with work to reduce the State's Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program payment error rate.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $96,400 $96,400
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $96,400 $96,400
1151 SNAP Contingency Fund N563
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to make benefit payments to Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program recipients in the event of a loss of federal funding.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $87,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $87,000,000 $0
2128 SNAP Outreach Grant Program N564
Initiative: Provides funding for grants to community-based organizations for Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program benefits outreach services and to hire outreach coordinators.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $750,000 $750,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $750,000 $750,000
2295
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $87,846,400 $846,400
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $87,846,400 $846,400
3370 Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
3381 takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2759(01)